Hawaii statutes.
§195-6.6 Reports. The department shall
submit annually a comprehensive status report on the natural area reserves
system and the natural area partnership program to include, but not be limited
to:

(1) A description of activities and accomplishments;

(2) Compliance with chapter 42F requirements;

(3) An analysis of the problems and issues
encountered in meeting or failing to meet the objectives set forth in the
management plans;

(4) The status of public hunting opportunities;

(5) The financial condition of the fund, including
receipts and expenditures for the fund for the previous fiscal year; and

(6) Plans and management objectives for the next
fiscal year.

The report shall be submitted to the governor and
the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each
regular legislative session. [L 1991, c 326, pt of §1; am L 1992, c 180, §3; am
L 1997, c 190, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next